dictsource/mr_rules
.group फ
        फ          p#V
        _L23) फ (L21_            p#@4     // generated
        _L23) फ (L21L22_         p#@4     // generated
        _L23) फ (L21             p#@4     // generated
        _L22L23) फ (L21_         p#@4     // generated
        _L22L23) फ (L21L22_      p#@4     // generated
        _L22L23) फ (L21          p#@4     // generated
        L23) फ (L21_             p#@4     // generated
        L23) फ (L21L22_          p#@4     // generated
        L23) फ (L21              p#@4     // generated
        _्) फ (L21_              p#@4     // generated
        _्) फ (L21L22_           p#@4     // generated
        _्) फ (L21               p#@4     // generated
        _L22्) फ (L21_           p#@4     // generated
        _L22्) फ (L21L22_        p#@4     // generated
        _L22्) फ (L21            p#@4     // generated
        ्) फ (L21_               p#@4     // generated
        ्) फ (L21L22_            p#@4     // generated
        ्) फ (L21                p#@4     // generated
        _L21L23) फ (L21L20_      p#       // generated
        _L21L23) फ (L21L20       p#       // generated
        L21L23) फ (L21L20_       p#       // generated
        L21L23) फ (L21L20        p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (L21्_           p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L21्            p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L21्_        p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L21्         p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L21्_            p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L21्             p#@4     // generated
        _ा) फ (L21L21_           p#       // generated
        _L22ा) फ (L21L21_        p#       // generated
        ा) फ (L21L21_            p#       // generated
        _L21) फ (L21L22्         p#       // generated
        _L22L21) फ (L21L22्      p#       // generated
        L21) फ (L21L22्          p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (L24_            p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L24L22_         p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L24             p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L24_         p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L24L22_      p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L24          p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L24_             p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L24L22_          p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L24              p#@4     // generated
        _L20) फ (L21L23_         p#       // generated
        _L20) फ (L21L23          p#       // generated
        _L22L20) फ (L21L23_      p#       // generated
        _L22L20) फ (L21L23       p#       // generated
        L20) फ (L21L23_          p#       // generated
        L20) फ (L21L23           p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (L21L22L23       p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L21L22L23    p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L21L22L23        p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L21_            p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L21_         p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L21_             p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L23_            p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L23L22_         p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L23             p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L23_         p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L23L22_      p#@4     // generated
        _L22L22) फ (L23          p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L23_             p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L23L22_          p#@4     // generated
        L22) फ (L23              p#@4     // generated
        _L22) फ (L21L22ण         p#       // generated
        _L22) फ (लL21_           p#       // generated
        _L22L22) फ (लL21_        p#       // generated
        L22) फ (लL21_            p#       // generated
        _L20) फ (L21ण_           p#       // generated
        _L22L20) फ (L21ण_        p#       // generated
        L20) फ (L21ण_            p#       // generated
        _L20) फ (L21L22्         p#       // generated
        _L22L20) फ (L21L22्      p#       // generated
        L20) फ (L21L22्          p#       // generated
        फ (B       p#
        फ़         fV
        फ़ (B      f

.group ब
        ब          bV
        _L23) ब (L21_            b@4      // generated
        _L23) ब (L21L22_         b@4      // generated
        _L23) ब (L21             b@4      // generated
        _L22L23) ब (L21_         b@4      // generated
        _L22L23) ब (L21L22_      b@4      // generated
        _L22L23) ब (L21          b@4      // generated
        L23) ब (L21_             b@4      // generated
        L23) ब (L21L22_          b@4      // generated
        L23) ब (L21              b@4      // generated
        _्) ब (L21_              b@4      // generated
        _्) ब (L21L22_           b@4      // generated
        _्) ब (L21               b@4      // generated
        _L22्) ब (L21_           b@4      // generated
        _L22्) ब (L21L22_        b@4      // generated
        _L22्) ब (L21            b@4      // generated
        ्) ब (L21_               b@4      // generated
        ्) ब (L21L22_            b@4      // generated
        ्) ब (L21                b@4      // generated
        _L21L23) ब (L21L20_      b        // generated
        _L21L23) ब (L21L20       b        // generated
        L21L23) ब (L21L20_       b        // generated
        L21L23) ब (L21L20        b        // generated
        _L22) ब (L21्_           b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L21्            b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L21्_        b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L21्         b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L21्_            b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L21्             b@4      // generated
        _ा) ब (L21L21_           b        // generated
        _L22ा) ब (L21L21_        b        // generated
        ा) ब (L21L21_            b        // generated
        _L21) ब (L21L22्         b        // generated
        _L22L21) ब (L21L22्      b        // generated
        L21) ब (L21L22्          b        // generated
        _L22) ब (L24_            b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L24L22_         b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L24             b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L24_         b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L24L22_      b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L24          b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L24_             b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L24L22_          b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L24              b@4      // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L23_         b        // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L23          b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L23_      b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L23       b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L23_          b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L23           b        // generated
        _L22) ब (L21L22L23       b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L21L22L23    b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L21L22L23        b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L21_            b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L21_         b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L21_             b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L23_            b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L23L22_         b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L23             b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L23_         b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L23L22_      b@4      // generated
        _L22L22) ब (L23          b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L23_             b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L23L22_          b@4      // generated
        L22) ब (L23              b@4      // generated
        _L22) ब (L21L22ण         b        // generated
        _L22) ब (लL21_           b        // generated
        _L22L22) ब (लL21_        b        // generated
        L22) ब (लL21_            b        // generated
        _L20) ब (L21ण_           b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21ण_        b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21ण_            b        // generated
        _L20) ब (L21L22्         b        // generated
        _L22L20) ब (L21L22्      b        // generated
        L20) ब (L21L22्          b        // generated
        ब (B       b
